Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-939
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing the Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 97.